New York, session 2025-2026, S9444.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The highway law is amended by adding a new section 345-e to 2 read as follows: 3 § 345-e. Portion of the state highway system to be dedicated to Jomani 4 Wright. All that portion of the state highway system constituting state 5 route one hundred two in the hamlet of Uniondale, county of Nassau, 6 beginning at the intersection of Uniondale Avenue and Front Street and 7 ending at the intersection of Chester Street and Front Street shall be 8 dedicated to Jomani Wright. 9 § 2. The commissioner of transportation shall provide for the instal- 10 lation and maintenance of adequate signing of the state highway system 11 as dedicated pursuant to section one of this act, provided that such 12 signing shall state "Highway Dedicated to Jomani Wright". However, to 13 avoid confusion and to limit any possible disruption of commerce, the 14 dedication called for pursuant to section one of this act shall be one 15 of ceremonial nature and the official name of such highway shall not be 16 changed as a result of this act. 17 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09440-05-6